Hawaii statutes.
[§467B‑17] Administrative
enforcement; cease and desist orders. (a) Whenever the attorney general
finds that a charitable organization has violated section 467B-2.1, the
attorney general may issue, in addition to the remedies prescribed by section
467B-9.7(b), a cease and desist order to the charitable organization.

(b) Any person aggrieved by an action of the
attorney general under this section may request an administrative hearing to
review that action in accordance with chapter 91 and rules adopted by the
attorney general. Any request for hearing shall be made within ten days after
the attorney general has served the person with notice of the action; provided
that notice shall be deemed effective upon mailing. [L 2011, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next